Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,304
Contract claims; filing procedure.

All contract claims shall be filed with the Risk Manager in the manner prescribed by the State Claims Board. Contract claims shall be filed on forms provided by the Risk Manager, and each claimant shall include at least the following information: (1) A copy of the contract allegedly breached; (2) the manner in which the contract was allegedly breached; and (3) the damages incurred as a result of the alleged breach. The Risk Manager shall immediately advise the Attorney General and the contracting agency in writing of the filing of any such claim. The contracting agency shall cause an investigation to be made of all such claims. The Attorney General shall serve as a legal advisor to the State Claims Board on all such claims.

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 54.